Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 82.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) Beginning July 1, 2026, in addition to all other taxes imposed under this chapter, persons must pay a surcharge on Washington taxable income arising from operating a private detention facility as defined in RCW 70.395.020 if the person has annual Washington gross receipts in excess of $1,000,000.(2) The rate of the surcharge is one percent of taxable income attributable to the operation of a private detention facility.--- END ---